Colorado, session 2026A, SB180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 118 to
-2- SB26-180

title 24 as follows:
ARTICLE 118
Investment Performance Authority
24-118-101. Legislative declaration.
(1) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(I) COLORADO'S ECONOMY DEPENDS ON WORKING FAMILIES
HAVING ACCESS TO AFFORDABLE CHILD CARE. WITHOUT RELIABLE CHILD
CARE, PARENTS ARE FORCED OUT OF THE WORKFORCE OR INTO PART-TIME
EMPLOYMENT, UNDERMINING BOTH FAMILY ECONOMIC SECURITY AND THE
STATE'S LABOR MARKET.
(II) CHILD CARE PROGRAMS FOR FAMILIES WITH LOW INCOMES IN
THE STATE ARE LARGELY SUPPORTED THROUGH FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT
FUNDING, WHICH HAS REMAINED FLAT FOR DECADES AND FAILED TO KEEP
PACE WITH INFLATION AND THE RISING COST OF CHILD CARE;
(III) AS A RESULT, THESE PROGRAMS OFTEN LACK SUFFICIENT
FUNDING TO SERVE ALL ELIGIBLE FAMILIES. FOR EXAMPLE, AS OF
FEBRUARY 1, 2026, MORE THAN THIRTEEN THOUSAND CHILDREN WERE
SUBJECT TO ENROLLMENT FREEZES IN PLACE IN NINETEEN COLORADO
COUNTIES OR WERE ON WAIT LISTS FOR THE COLORADO CHILD CARE
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. RURAL COMMUNITIES, IN PARTICULAR, OFTEN
HAVE FEWER PROVIDERS AND LIMITED CAPACITY, CREATING GEOGRAPHIC
INEQUITIES BETWEEN FAMILIES WHO CAN BENEFIT FROM CHILD CARE
PROGRAMS.
(IV) THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF INADEQUATELY FUNDING CHILD
CARE SERVICES FOR WORKING FAMILIES IS SEVERE. ACCORDING TO A 2024
ANALYSIS, COLORADO'S GROSS DOMESTIC PRODUCT LOSES OVER THREE
BILLION DOLLARS ANNUALLY WHEN PARENTS CANNOT WORK DUE TO LACK
-3- SB26-180

OF CHILD CARE. THIS FIGURE DOES NOT ACCOUNT FOR LOST CONSUMER
SPENDING, REDUCED BUSINESS PRODUCTIVITY, OR THE EFFECTS ON LOCAL
ECONOMIES ACROSS THE STATE.
(V) WORKING PARENTS WITH LIMITED CHILD CARE OPTIONS OFTEN
RELY ON FRIEND, FAMILY, OR NEIGHBOR CHILD CARE PROVIDERS, WHO
SACRIFICE OTHER INCOME-GENERATING OPPORTUNITIES, WHICH FURTHER
NEGATIVELY IMPACTS COLORADO'S ECONOMY, TO ENSURE THE SAFE CARE
OF THE CHILDREN IN THEIR LIVES.
(VI) SAFE, HIGH-QUALITY EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAMS PRODUCE
LONG-TERM OUTCOMES THAT BENEFIT BOTH INDIVIDUALS AND SOCIETY.
A 2017 ANALYSIS FOUND THAT CHILDREN WHO ATTEND QUALITY EARLY
CARE PROGRAMS HAVE HIGHER HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION RATES AND
HIGHER EMPLOYMENT LEVELS AS ADULTS. THESE OUTCOMES REDUCE
FUTURE PUBLIC EXPENDITURES WHILE INCREASING ECONOMIC
PRODUCTIVITY.
(b) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT ADDRESSING
THE FUNDING CRISIS IN THIS AREA REQUIRES A SIGNIFICANT STATE-DRIVEN
INVESTMENT TO ELIMINATE WAIT LISTS AND ENROLLMENT FREEZES, SERVE
ELIGIBLE FAMILIES, AND STRENGTHEN COLORADO'S ECONOMY.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) GIVEN THE CURRENT GENERAL FUND BUDGETARY
CONSTRAINTS, AN ALTERNATIVE PATH IS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE SUPPORT
FOR THE CHILD CARE NEEDS OF WORKING FAMILIES WITH LOW INCOMES IN
THE STATE AND THAT IT IS PARAMOUNT TO PROVIDE THIS SUPPORT AS
DIRECTLY AS POSSIBLE TO THOSE FAMILIES;
(b) THE MAJORITY OF STATE MONEY IS INVESTED BY THE STATE
TREASURER IN FIXED-INCOME ASSETS THAT HAVE COMPARATIVELY LOW
-4- SB26-180

RETURNS; AND
(c) ALLOWING CERTAIN STATE MONEY TO BE INVESTED IN A MORE
FLEXIBLE MANNER TO GENERATE BETTER RETURNS PROVIDES AN
OPPORTUNITY TO MAXIMIZE THE RATE OF RETURN ON PUBLIC MONEY
WHILE PROVIDING ADDITIONAL SUPPORT DIRECTLY TO LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS TO ADDRESS THE CHILD CARE NEEDS OF WORKING FAMILIES
WITH LOW INCOMES.
24-118-102. Definitions. AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 118, UNLESS
THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "AUTHORITY" MEANS THE INVESTMENT PERFORMANCE
AUTHORITY CREATED IN THIS ARTICLE 118.
(2) "BOARD" MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
AUTHORITY.
(3) "CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE ALLOCATION COMMITTEE" MEANS
THE CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE ALLOCATION COMMITTEE CREATED IN
SECTION 26.5-4-110.
(4) "DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD" MEANS THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, CREATED IN SECTION 26.5-1-104.
(5) "ELIGIBLE ENTITY" MEANS:
(a) A DEPARTMENT, BOARD, BUREAU, COMMISSION, DIVISION,
INSTITUTION, QUASI-GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, OR OTHER AGENCY OR
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE, INCLUDING A STATE INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION.
(b) AN ENTERPRISE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (3); OR
(c) A SPECIAL PURPOSE AUTHORITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-77-102 (15)(b).
(6) "SECURITY" MEANS A BILL, STOCK, NOTE, BOND, BANKERS'
-5- SB26-180

ACCEPTANCE, COMMERCIAL PAPER, PROPERTY ASSET, REAL ESTATE
INVESTMENT TRUST, PRIVATE EQUITY ASSET, REPURCHASE AGREEMENT,
REVERSE REPURCHASE AGREEMENT, SECURITIES LENDING AGREEMENT,
GUARANTEED INVESTMENT CONTRACT, GUARANTEED INTEREST
CONTRACT, ANNUITY CONTRACT, FUNDING AGREEMENT, CERTIFICATE OF
INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER EVIDENCE OF INDEBTEDNESS, INTEREST IN ANY
SECURITY, OR, IN GENERAL, ANY INTEREST OR INSTRUMENT COMMONLY
KNOWN AS A "SECURITY" OR ANY CERTIFICATE OF INTEREST OR
PARTICIPATION IN, TEMPORARY OR INTERIM CERTIFICATE FOR, GUARANTEE
OF, OR WARRANT OR RIGHT TO SUBSCRIBE TO OR PURCHASE ANY SECURITY.
24-118-103. Investment performance authority - creation -
board.
(1) THERE IS CREATED THE INVESTMENT PERFORMANCE
AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY IS A SPECIAL PURPOSE AUTHORITY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (15), AND IS A BODY CORPORATE AND A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE. THE AUTHORITY IS NOT AN AGENCY
OF STATE GOVERNMENT AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO ADMINISTRATIVE
DIRECTION BY ANY DEPARTMENT, COMMISSION, BOARD, BUREAU, OR
AGENCY OF THE STATE.
(2) (a) THE POWERS OF THE AUTHORITY ARE VESTED IN THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE AUTHORITY, WHICH IS A BOARD OF DIRECTORS.
THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE SEVEN FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THE STATE TREASURER OR THE STATE TREASURER'S DESIGNEE,
WHO SERVES AS CHAIR OF THE BOARD;
(II) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH PROFESSIONAL EXPERIENCE IN
-6- SB26-180

MANAGING FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT MONEY OR
MANAGING THE MONEY OF AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR
OTHER ENDOWMENT FUND, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(IV) TWO INDIVIDUALS WITH PROFESSIONAL EXPERIENCE IN
INVESTMENT CONSULTING OR INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT, WITH ONE
INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND ONE INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY
LEADER OF THE SENATE;
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED IN THE CHILD CARE FIELD,
APPOINTED BY THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE; AND
(VI) AN INDIVIDUAL WORKING WITH A CHILD CARE ADVOCACY
ORGANIZATION, APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES.
(b) (I) APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVE THREE-YEAR
TERMS; EXCEPT THAT THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS INITIALLY APPOINTED
BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE MAJORITY
LEADER OF THE SENATE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (2)(a)(IV) AND
(2)(a)(V) OF THIS SECTION IS FOUR YEARS. A MEMBER MAY BE APPOINTED
FOR NO MORE THAN THREE CONSECUTIVE TERMS. ANY VACANCY MUST BE
FILLED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE ORIGINAL APPOINTMENT, FOR THE
DURATION OF THE UNEXPIRED TERM.
(II) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THEIR INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD NO LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A MEMBER MAY BE REMOVED FROM THE BOARD BY:
(I) MAJORITY VOTE OF THE AUTHORITY BOARD FOR MISFEASANCE,
MALFEASANCE, WILLFUL NEGLECT OF DUTY, OR OTHER CAUSE AFTER
-7- SB26-180

NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING, UNLESS NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING
ARE EXPRESSLY WAIVED IN WRITING BY THE MEMBER AT RISK OF BEING
REMOVED; OR
(II) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY FOR CAUSE.
(d) (I) THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD SHALL CALL THE FIRST MEETING
OF THE BOARD TO OCCUR NO LATER THAN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY. THE CHAIR
SHALL SCHEDULE THE MEETINGS OF THE BOARD AND MAY CALL
ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS NECESSARY FOR THE BOARD TO COMPLETE ITS
DUTIES.
(e) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION BUT
MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR ACTUAL AND REASONABLE EXPENSES INCURRED
IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(f) (I) ALL MEETINGS OF THE BOARD ARE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC. THE
BOARD MUST TRANSACT ALL BUSINESS AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL
MEETING AT WHICH A QUORUM CONSISTING OF AT LEAST A MAJORITY OF
THE TOTAL MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD IS PRESENT. ANY ACTION OF THE
BOARD REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE
MEMBERS PRESENT AT THE MEETING.
(II) ONE OR MORE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD MAY PARTICIPATE IN
ANY MEETING AND MAY VOTE THROUGH THE USE OF
TELECOMMUNICATIONS DEVICES, INCLUDING A CONFERENCE TELEPHONE
OR SIMILAR COMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT. PARTICIPATION THROUGH
TELECOMMUNICATIONS DEVICES CONSTITUTES PRESENCE IN PERSON AT
THE MEETING. USE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS FOR PARTICIPATION DOES
NOT SUPERSEDE ANY REQUIREMENTS FOR OPEN MEETINGS OTHERWISE
-8- SB26-180

PROVIDED BY LAW.
(g) ALL PUBLIC RECORDS OF THE BOARD ARE SUBJECT TO THE
"COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF THIS TITLE
24. ALL RECORDS ARE SUBJECT TO ANY BUDGET AND AUDIT LAWS
APPLICABLE TO THE AUTHORITY AND MAY BE SUBJECT TO REGULAR AUDIT
TO THE EXTENT REQUIRED BY LAW.
(3) (a) THE BOARD AND ANY EMPLOYEE, AGENT, OR ADVISER OF
THE AUTHORITY SHALL ACT IN GOOD FAITH AND IN A COMMERCIALLY
REASONABLE MANNER.
(b) (I) ANY BOARD MEMBER, EMPLOYEE, AGENT, OR ADVISER OF
THE AUTHORITY WHO HAS A DIRECT OR INDIRECT INTEREST IN ANY
CONTRACT, TRANSACTION, OR PROPOSAL WITH THE AUTHORITY SHALL
DISCLOSE THE INTEREST TO THE AUTHORITY. THE INTEREST MUST BE SET
FORTH IN THE MINUTES OF THE AUTHORITY, AND A BOARD MEMBER,
EMPLOYEE, AGENT, OR ADVISER WHO HAS THE INTEREST SHALL NOT
PARTICIPATE ON BEHALF OF THE AUTHORITY IN THE AUTHORIZATION OF
THE CONTRACT, TRANSACTION, OR PROPOSAL.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b), THE BOARD
MEMBER EMPLOYED IN THE CHILD CARE FIELD AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(V) OF THIS SECTION MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE
AUTHORIZATION OF A CONTRACT, TRANSACTION, OR PROPOSAL UNLESS
THE BOARD MEMBER IS THE DIRECTOR OR OWNER OF A RELEVANT CHILD
CARE CENTER.
(4) THE AUTHORITY MAY HIRE STAFF AND ENTER INTO CONTRACTS
AS IT DEEMS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO ADMINISTER THIS ARTICLE
118.
(5) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS CORPORATE EXISTENCE CONTINUES
-9- SB26-180

UNTIL TERMINATED BY LAW; EXCEPT THAT A LAW MUST NOT TAKE EFFECT
SO LONG AS THE AUTHORITY HAS OUTSTANDING OBLIGATIONS UNLESS
ADEQUATE PROVISION HAS BEEN MADE FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE
OUTSTANDING OBLIGATIONS. UPON TERMINATION OF THE EXISTENCE OF
THE AUTHORITY, ALL ITS RIGHTS AND PROPERTIES IN EXCESS OF ITS
OBLIGATIONS MUST PASS TO AND BE VESTED IN THE STATE.
(6) THE INCOME AND REVENUE OF THE AUTHORITY AND ANY
PROPERTY OWNED BY THE AUTHORITY ARE EXEMPT FROM ALL TAXATION
AND ASSESSMENTS IN COLORADO.
24-118-104. Investment performance authority - general
powers and duties.
(1) THE AUTHORITY HAS AND MAY EXERCISE ALL RIGHTS AND
POWERS NECESSARY OR INCIDENTAL TO, OR IMPLIED FROM, THE SPECIFIC
POWERS GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE 118, WHICH SPECIFIC POWERS SHALL
NOT BE CONSIDERED AS A LIMITATION UPON ANY POWER NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES AND INTENT OF THIS ARTICLE
118. IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER POWERS GRANTED TO THE AUTHORITY IN
THIS ARTICLE 118, THE AUTHORITY HAS THE DUTIES, PRIVILEGES,
IMMUNITIES, RIGHTS, LIABILITIES, AND DISABILITIES OF A BODY
CORPORATE AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE AND THE DUTIES
AND POWERS TO:
(a) HAVE PERPETUAL EXISTENCE AND SUCCESSION;
(b) ADOPT, ALTER, HAVE, AND USE A SEAL;
(c) SUE AND BE SUED AND OTHERWISE ASSERT OR DEFEND THE
AUTHORITY'S LEGAL INTERESTS;
(d) FIX THE TIME AND PLACE AT WHICH REGULAR AND SPECIAL
MEETINGS MAY BE HELD;
-10- SB26-180

(e) ADOPT, AMEND, OR REPEAL BYLAWS, POLICIES, AND
PROCEDURES CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 118;
(f) MAKE BUSINESS DECISIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS ARTICLE 118;
(g) MAKE AND EXECUTE AGREEMENTS, CONTRACTS, AND OTHER
INSTRUMENTS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT IN THE EXERCISE OF THE
POWERS AND FUNCTIONS OF THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
118;
(h) ACQUIRE OFFICE SPACE, EQUIPMENT, SERVICES, SUPPLIES, AND
INSURANCE NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE
118;
(i) APPOINT OR CONTRACT WITH AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND
PROFESSIONAL AND BUSINESS ADVISERS AS NECESSARY IN THE
AUTHORITY'S JUDGMENT TO ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE
118 AND TO FIX THE COMPENSATION AND ESTABLISH THE DUTIES OF THE
AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND ADVISERS, INCLUDING CONTRACTING WITH THE
OFFICERS, PERSONNEL, AND CONSULTANTS OF THE STATE TREASURER TO
PERFORM ANY ACTIVITIES SPECIFIED IN THIS ARTICLE 118;
(j) INVEST MONEY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-118-105;
(k) CHARGE TO AND COLLECT FROM ELIGIBLE ENTITIES FEES AND
CHARGES IN CONNECTION WITH THE AUTHORITY'S INVESTMENT SERVICES,
INCLUDING FEES AND CHARGES SUFFICIENT TO REIMBURSE THE AUTHORITY
FOR COSTS NECESSARILY INCURRED BY THE AUTHORITY IN CONNECTION
WITH CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSE AND INTENT OF THIS ARTICLE 118 AND
THE ESTABLISHMENT AND MAINTENANCE OF RESERVES OR OTHER MONEY,
AS THE AUTHORITY MAY DETERMINE TO BE REASONABLE; AND
(l) CONTRACT FOR AND TO SEEK AND ACCEPT ANY GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS AND LOANS OF FUNDS, PROPERTY, OR OTHER AID IN ANY
-11- SB26-180

FORM FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, ANY STATE AGENCY,
ANY OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE, OR ANY COMBINATION THEREOF,
AND TO COMPLY, SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 118, WITH
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF SUCH CONTRACTS OR THE ACCEPTANCE OF
SUCH ITEMS.
(2) ANY CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO
THIS ARTICLE 118 IS EXEMPT FROM THE "PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES
101 TO 112 OF THIS TITLE 24.
24-118-105. Investment of public money - duties - eligible
entities - investment options.
(1) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, THE AUTHORITY MAY INVEST MONEY ON BEHALF OF ELIGIBLE
ENTITIES THAT HAVE CHOSEN TO HAVE THEIR MONEY INVESTED BY THE
AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY MAY POOL MONEY FROM ELIGIBLE ENTITIES
AND INVEST THE MONEY TO INCREASE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE ELIGIBLE
ENTITIES' MONEY ACCORDING TO THIS SECTION.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ACT AS A PRUDENT INVESTOR AND USE
CARE TO PRESERVE THE MONEY OF EACH ELIGIBLE ENTITY WHILE ALSO
ATTEMPTING TO SECURE THE MAXIMUM RATE OF RETURN, CONSIDERING
THE PROBABLE INCOME AS WELL AS THE PROBABLE SAFETY OF THEIR
MONEY.
(c) THE AUTHORITY HAS THE POWER TO:
(I) INVEST ANY MONEY NOT REQUIRED FOR IMMEDIATE
DISBURSEMENT;
(II) SELL SECURITIES AND PROPERTY PURCHASED AND HELD BY
THE AUTHORITY;
(III) DEPOSIT SECURITIES IN ANY BANK WITHIN OR WITHOUT THE
-12- SB26-180

STATE; AND
(IV) INVEST ANY MONEY IN UNSECURED PROMISSORY NOTES OF A
NATIONAL BANK HAVING THE HIGHEST INVESTMENT RATINGS.
(2) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL OFFER MULTIPLE INVESTING
OPTIONS TO ELIGIBLE ENTITIES INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, TWO
INVESTMENT OPTIONS THAT VARY BASED ON DURATION.
(b) FOR EACH INVESTMENT OPTION THAT THE AUTHORITY OFFERS,
THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEVELOP A STATEMENT OF THE DETAILS,
PURPOSES, AND OBJECTIVES OF THE INVESTMENT OPTION, WHICH
STATEMENT MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES;
(II) A DESCRIPTION OF ELIGIBLE INVESTMENTS;
(III) CREDIT STANDARDS FOR INVESTMENTS;
(IV) ALLOWABLE MATURITY RANGES FOR INVESTMENTS;
(V) THE PORTFOLIO CONCENTRATIONS PERMITTED FOR EACH TYPE
OF SECURITY OWNED; AND
(VI) THE SAFEKEEPING PRACTICES UTILIZED.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEVELOP PROCEDURES OUTLINING:
(a) MAXIMUM AND MINIMUM ACCOUNT SIZES;
(b) MAXIMUM AND MINIMUM TRANSACTION SIZES;
(c) INSTRUCTIONS FOR ESTABLISHING ACCOUNTS AND MAKING
DEPOSITS TO AND WITHDRAWALS FROM SUCH ACCOUNTS;
(d) LIMITATIONS, IF ANY, ON THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF MONEY
THAT THE AUTHORITY MAY INVEST ON BEHALF OF A PARTICIPATING
ELIGIBLE ENTITY AT ANY ONE TIME;
(e) PENALTIES UPON PARTICIPATING ELIGIBLE ENTITIES FOR EARLY
WITHDRAWAL OF MONEY INVESTED BY THE AUTHORITY ON THEIR BEHALF
-13- SB26-180

AND PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING OTHER CONTINGENCIES THAT MAY
JEOPARDIZE THE EARNING POTENTIAL OF AN ACCOUNT;
(f) DISBURSEMENT OF THE INCOME FROM THE INVESTMENT OF
MONEY BY THE AUTHORITY ACCORDING TO THE PROCESS OUTLINED IN
SECTION 24-118-107;
(g) ARRANGEMENTS FOR THE CUSTODY, SAFEKEEPING, AND
REGISTRATION OF ALL INVESTMENT SECURITIES AS THE AUTHORITY DEEMS
NECESSARY; AND
(h) INTERVALS FOR REPORTS TO EACH PARTICIPATING ELIGIBLE
ENTITY THAT SHOW THE INVESTMENTS AND THE EARNINGS THEREON.
(4) THE AUTHORITY MAY INVEST IN ANY APPROPRIATE SECURITY,
IN THE AUTHORITY'S DISCRETION. THE AUTHORITY MAY INVEST PUBLIC
MONEY IN SECURITIES AND OTHER INVESTMENTS THAT WOULD NOT
OTHERWISE BE ALLOWED PURSUANT TO PART 6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF THIS
TITLE 24 OR ANY OTHER PROVISION OF STATE LAW GOVERNING THE
INVESTMENT OF PUBLIC MONEY. THE INVESTMENTS MADE BY THE
AUTHORITY ARE NOT LIMITED TO THOSE INSTRUMENTS IN WHICH THE
STATE TREASURER OR AN INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE ENTITY IS STATUTORILY
AUTHORIZED TO INVEST.
(5) THE AUTHORITY MAY CREATE ACCOUNTS AS NECESSARY TO
ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 118. THE AUTHORITY MAY
ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO ADMINISTER THE ACCOUNTS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS ARTICLE 118 AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE PROVISION OF STATE
LAW. MONEY IN THE ACCOUNTS MUST BE SECURED IN THE MANNER
DETERMINED BY THE AUTHORITY AND MAY ONLY BE WITHDRAWN ON THE
ORDER OF AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED BY THE AUTHORITY.
24-118-106. Eligible entities - opt-in to investment of money by
-14- SB26-180

the authority - conditions.
(1) AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS SET
FORTH IN THIS SECTION MAY CHOOSE TO HAVE THE AUTHORITY INVEST
SOME OR ALL OF THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY'S MONEY ON BEHALF OF THE
ELIGIBLE ENTITY, INSTEAD OF THE STATE TREASURER OR OTHER
AUTHORIZED PERSON, SO LONG AS THE MONEY TO BE INVESTED FROM THAT
FUND BY THE AUTHORITY ON BEHALF OF THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY MEETS ALL
OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(a) THE MONEY IS IN A SPECIAL FUND THAT IS NOT PART OF THE
GENERAL REVENUES OF THE STATE;
(b) WHEN RECEIVED IN THE FUND, THE MONEY DID NOT
CONSTITUTE STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-77-102 (7), FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION;
(c) THE MONEY IS A LIQUID ASSET;
(d) THE MONEY IS UNENCUMBERED;
(e) INVESTING THE MONEY IS NOT FORECASTED BY THE ELIGIBLE
ENTITY TO CREATE A NEGATIVE CASH BALANCE IN THE FUND AT ANY TIME
OVER THE DESIRED INVESTMENT PERIOD; AND
(f) INVESTING THE MONEY IS NOT FORECASTED BY THE CHAIR OF
THE BOARD, WHO IS THE STATE TREASURER OR THE STATE TREASURER'S
DESIGNEE, TO UNDULY BURDEN THE STATE TREASURER'S POOLED FUNDS.
(2) AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY MAY CHOOSE TO HAVE THE AUTHORITY
INVEST MONEY ON BEHALF OF THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY ONLY UPON APPROVAL
OF:
(a) THE GOVERNING BOARD, LEADERSHIP, OR DIRECTOR OF THE
ELIGIBLE ENTITY, AS APPROPRIATE; AND
-15- SB26-180

(b) (I) THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD WHO IS THE STATE TREASURER OR
THE STATE TREASURER'S DESIGNEE; OR
(II) THE MEMBER OF THE BOARD WHO IS THE DIRECTOR OF THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING OR THE DIRECTOR'S
DESIGNEE.
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE AUTHORITY, AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY
MAY SELECT ANY OF THE AUTHORITY'S INVESTMENT OFFERINGS FOR ITS
MONEY.
24-118-107. Disbursement of investment earnings - eligible
entities - authority costs - child care assistance.
(1) IF AVAILABLE, IN THE AUTHORITY'S DISCRETION, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL QUARTERLY DISBURSE ON A PRO RATA BASIS TO
ELIGIBLE ENTITIES EARNINGS FROM THE AUTHORITY'S INVESTMENT OF
MONEY ON BEHALF OF THE ELIGIBLE ENTITIES.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE DISBURSEMENTS
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE
AUTHORITY MAY DEDUCT FROM THE EARNINGS FROM THE AUTHORITY'S
INVESTMENT OF MONEY ON BEHALF OF ELIGIBLE ENTITIES AMOUNTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE AUTHORITY TO:
(a) PAY THE REASONABLE COSTS AND EXPENSES OF THE
AUTHORITY RELATED TO THE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS ARTICLE 118,
WHICH COSTS MUST NOT EXCEED ONE PERCENT OF THE EARNINGS FROM
THE AUTHORITY'S INVESTMENT OF MONEY ON BEHALF OF ELIGIBLE
ENTITIES;
(b) RETAIN AS A RESERVE, WHICH THE AUTHORITY MAY USE FOR
DISBURSEMENTS AS THE BOARD DEEMS NECESSARY AND ACCORDING TO
THE PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD; AND
-16- SB26-180

(c) DISBURSE TO COUNTIES FOR CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE AS SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH, IN COORDINATION WITH
THE CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ALLOCATION COMMITTEE AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD, A FORMULA FOR DISBURSEMENTS TO
COUNTIES FOR CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE TO FAMILIES WITH LOW INCOMES.
THE CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ALLOCATION COMMITTEE AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD MUST AGREE UPON ANY ADJUSTMENT
OF THE FORMULA ONCE THE AUTHORITY HAS ESTABLISHED THE FORMULA.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY CHILDHOOD AND THE CHILD CARE
ASSISTANCE ALLOCATION COMMITTEE SHALL, WITHIN EXISTING
APPROPRIATIONS, PROVIDE CONSULTATION AND SUPPORT TO THE
AUTHORITY AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
24-118-108. Startup costs.
FOR THE PURPOSES OF MEETING THE NECESSARY EXPENSES OF
INITIAL ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION, UNTIL THE AUTHORITY
OTHERWISE DERIVES SUFFICIENT MONEY PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 118,
THE AUTHORITY OR THE DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY MAY SEEK,
ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR
PUBLIC SOURCES OR BORROW MONEY AS MAY BE REQUIRED FOR THE
NECESSARY EXPENSES OF ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE
AUTHORITY, INCLUDING BORROWING FROM FEE REVENUE GENERATED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-120. THE AUTHORITY SHALL REPAY THE
BORROWED MONEY WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME AFTER THE AUTHORITY
RECEIVES MONEY PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 118.
24-118-109. Annual report - money and activities subject to
audit.
-17- SB26-180

(1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT OF ITS
ACTIVITIES TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY NOT LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30 OF EACH YEAR,
BEGINNING IN 2028. THE REPORT MUST SET FORTH A COMPLETE
OPERATING AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT COVERING THE PREVIOUS STATE
FISCAL YEAR.
(2) ALL MONEY AND ACTIVITIES OF THE AUTHORITY, INCLUDING
ITS RECEIPTS, DISBURSEMENTS, CONTRACTS, LEASES, MONEY,
INVESTMENTS, AND ANY OTHER RECORDS AND PAPERS RELATING TO ITS
FINANCIAL STANDING, ARE SUBJECT TO ANNUAL AUDIT, AT THE
AUTHORITY'S EXPENSE, ACCORDING TO THE PROVISIONS OF PART 6 OF
ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 29.
24-118-110. Liability of authority - prohibited acts.
(1) A BOARD MEMBER OR ANY EMPLOYEE, OFFICER, OR AGENT OF
THE AUTHORITY WHO, IN THE GOOD FAITH PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES,
COMPLIES WITH THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THIS ARTICLE 118 FOR
THE INVESTMENT OF MONEY FROM ELIGIBLE ENTITIES SHALL NOT BE
LIABLE FOR THE LOSS OF PUBLIC MONEY RESULTING FROM SUCH
INVESTMENT.
(2) A BOARD MEMBER OR ANY EMPLOYEE, OFFICER, OR AGENT OF
THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ACCEPT OR
RECEIVE FROM ANY OTHER PERSON, FOR THEMSELF OR OTHERWISE THAN
ON BEHALF OF THE AUTHORITY, ANY FEE, REWARD, OR COMPENSATION IN
CONSIDERATION OF THE INVESTMENT OF PUBLIC MONEY OR IN
CONSIDERATION OF ANY AGREEMENT OR ARRANGEMENT TOUCHING UPON
THE USE OF THE INCOME FROM SUCH INVESTMENT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-77-102, amend
-18- SB26-180

(15)(b)(XXI) and (15)(b)(XXII); and add (15)(b)(XXIII) as follows:
24-77-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 77, unless the context otherwise requires:
(15) (b) "Special purpose authority" includes, but is not limited to:
(XXI) The equal justice authority created in section 13-5.7-202;
and
(XXII) The building urgent infrastructure and leveraging dollars
authority created in section 24-117-104 (1); AND
(XXIII) THE INVESTMENT PERFORMANCE AUTHORITY CREATED IN
SECTION 24-118-103.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-19- SB26-180